Alabama, session 2026rs, HB470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
37 Section 1. Section 36-27-8.2, Code of Alabama 1975, as
38 last amended by Act 2025-409, 2025 Regular Session, is amended
39 to read as follows:
40 "§36-27-8.2
41 (a) Any individual who is retired under the Employees'
42 Retirement System may perform duties in any capacity,
43 including as an independent contractor, with any employer
44 participating in the Employees' Retirement System or the
45 Teachers' Retirement System without suspension of his or her
46 retirement allowance provided that: (i) the individual is not
47 employed in a permanent full-time capacity; and (ii) the
48 individual's compensation from the employer in calendar year
49 2016 does not exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).
50 Beginning in calendar year 2017, and each calendar year
51 thereafter, the annual earning limit shall be increased by the
52 same percentage increase as the increase in the Consumer Price
53 Index for all urban consumers as published by the U.S.
54 Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. Any increase
55 in the annual earning limit shall be rounded to the next
56 lowest multiple of one thousand dollars ($1,000) with any
Page 2

lowest multiple of one thousand dollars ($1,000) with any
HB470 INTRODUCED
57 amount in excess of the one thousand dollar ($1,000) multiple
58 considered in determining the increase for the following year.
59 Each adjustment shall be based on the increase in the index
60 for the preceding 12-month period ending on September 30 and
61 the increase shall be effective for the following calendar
62 year.
63 (b)(1) Any individual who is retired under the
64 Employees' Retirement System or Teachers' Retirement System
65 may perform duties in any capacity, including as an
66 independent contractor, with any employer participating in the
67 Employees' Retirement System or the Teachers' Retirement
68 System without suspension of his or her retirement benefits
69 and without regard for the annual earning limit described in
70 subsection (a), provided that the individual meets all of the
71 following criteria:
72 a. The individual has drawn his or her retirement
73 benefit for 12 consecutive months.
74 b. The individual commits to working for that employer
75 for three consecutive years.
76 c. The individual pays an amount equal to a specified
77 percentage of the individual's earnable compensation to
78 support the administrative expenses of the retirement system.
79 The percentage rate shall be fixed by the Board of Control and
80 may not be recouped to the individual.
81 (2) An individual employed pursuant to this section may
82 not participate in or accrue additional benefits under the
83 Employees' Retirement System or the Teachers' Retirement
84 System for that service.
Page 3

System for that service.
HB470 INTRODUCED
85 (c) Any individual serving as an elected official who
86 has retired from the Employees' Retirement System may serve
87 for his or her full compensation in an elected public office
88 with the state, a county, or an incorporated municipality
89 without suspension of retirement benefits;, provided, that
90 under no circumstances shall such an individual participate in
91 or accrue additional benefits under the Teachers' Retirement
92 System or the Employees' Retirement System for that service,
93 and provided that under no circumstances shall an individual
94 whose retirement is based upon service as an elected official
95 continue in or return to the office and receive both pension
96 benefits and salary. Any provision of this subsection to the
97 contrary notwithstanding, a retiree serving as a local elected
98 superintendent of education shall not receive both pension
99 benefits and salary unless his or her compensation as a local
100 elected superintendent of education does not exceed the annual
101 earning limits provided in subsection (a).
102 (d)(c) The responsibility for compliance with this
103 section is placed upon the employing authority, and each
104 retiree performing duties under this section shall certify to
105 the employer any information required in order to carry out
106 this section. The retiree shall provide written notice of the
107 postretirement employment under this section to the Employees'
108 Retirement System and employing authority within 30 days after
109 the date the retiree knows or should know that he or she will
110 be performing duties on a full-time or permanent basis or will
111 earn an amount in excess of the annual earning limit under
112 this section.
Page 4

this section.
HB470 INTRODUCED
113 (e)(d)(1) Any individual who is retired under the
114 Employees' Retirement System or the Teachers' Retirement
115 System, has the applicable Alabama Peace Officers' Standards
116 and Training certification, and was classified as either a law
117 enforcement officer, as defined in Section 36-27-59, or a
118 state policeman, as defined in Section 36-27-1, prior to
119 retirement, may perform duties as a school resource officer,
120 as defined in Section 16-1-44.1, a correctional officer with
121 the Department of Corrections, or a police officer at any
122 state college or university pursuant to Section 16-22-1
123 without suspension of his or her retirement allowance,
124 provided that the compensation earned does not exceed
125 fifty-two thousand dollars ($52,000) per year.
126 (2) Any individual who is retired under the Employees'
127 Retirement System, has the applicable Alabama Peace Officers'
128 Standards and Training certification, and meets any of the
129 following criteria may perform duties as a correctional
130 officer with the Department of Corrections without suspension
131 of his or her retirement allowance, provided that the
132 compensation earned does not exceed fifty-two thousand dollars
133 ($52,000) per year:
134 a. Was classified as a law enforcement officer, as
135 defined in Section 36-27-59, prior to retirement.
136 b. Was classified as a state policeman, as defined in
137 Section 36-27-1, prior to retirement.
138 c. Was classified as a correctional officer, as defined
139 in Section 36-27-59, prior to retirement, and retired pursuant
140 to Section 36-27-16(a)(1)c.
Page 5

to Section 36-27-16(a)(1)c.
HB470 INTRODUCED
141 (3) Any individual who is retired under the Employees'
142 Retirement System, who has both the applicable Alabama
143 Firefighters' Personnel Standards and Education Commission
144 certification and the applicable State Board of Health
145 certification as a firefighter and an emergency medical
146 services personnel, as defined in Section 36-27-59, prior to
147 retirement, may perform duties as a firemedic without
148 suspension of his or her retirement allowance provided that
149 the compensation earned does not exceed fifty-two thousand
150 dollars ($52,000) per year, commensurate with the work
151 actually performed.
152 (4) This subsection shall have retroactive application
153 to January 1, 2023, and no individual may be employed pursuant
154 to this subsection after December 31, 2030."
155 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
156 1, 2026.
Page 6